New York, session 2025-2026, S3877.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The New York city charter is amended by adding a new 2 section 645-a to read as follows: 3 § 645-a. Additional powers and duties of the department. In the event 4 that a property owner submits an application for a permit for the demo- 5 lition or the substantial alteration or renovation of any building or 6 structure and represents to the department that no tenants are living at 7 the property, the department shall independently confirm that there are 8 no tenants living at the property prior to approving or issuing such 9 permit. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 11 ing the date upon which it shall have become a law. Effective immediate- 12 ly, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation 13 necessary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 14 authorized to be made on or before such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07403-01-5